Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1655
Potential jurors; how selected.

(1) Prior to the jury term or at any time during the jury term, the jury commissioner may draw potential jurors from the master key list for service on petit jury panels that will be needed throughout the jury term. The jury commissioner shall draw such number of potential jurors from the master key list as the judge or judges direct.

(2) In drawing the names of potential jurors, the jury commissioner may use a manual jury selection process or a jury management system. The jury commissioner shall investigate the potential jurors so drawn pursuant to the two-step qualifying and summoning system or the one-step qualifying and summoning system.

(3)(a) If the jury commissioner uses the two-step qualifying and summoning system, he or she shall deliver to each potential juror a juror qualification form pursuant to section 25-1657.

(b) If the jury commissioner uses the one-step qualifying and summoning system, he or she shall deliver to each potential juror a juror qualification form pursuant to section 25-1657 and shall serve the potential juror with a summons pursuant to section 25-1660.

Laws 2020, LB387, § 12.